src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-11laeteq_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - läteq: # Noun (11) läteq 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     läteq+N+Sg+Nom: läteq
     läteq+N+Sg+Gen: lätte
     läteq+N+Sg+Par: lätet
     läteq+N+Sg+Ill: lättehe
     läteq+N+Sg+Ine: lätten
     läteq+N+Sg+Ela: lättest
     läteq+N+Sg+All: lättele
     läteq+N+Sg+Ade: lättel
     läteq+N+Sg+Abl: lättelt
     läteq+N+Sg+Tra: lättes
     läteq+N+Sg+Ter: lätteniq
     läteq+N+Sg+Abe: lätteldäq
     läteq+N+Sg+Com: lättegaq
     läteq+N+Pl+Nom: lätteq
     läteq+N+Pl+Gen: lättide
     läteq+N+Pl+Par: lättit
     läteq+N+Pl+Ill: lättihe
     läteq+N+Pl+Ine: lättin
     läteq+N+Pl+Ela: lättist
     läteq+N+Pl+All: lättile
     läteq+N+Pl+Ade: lättil
     läteq+N+Pl+Abl: lättilt
     läteq+N+Pl+Tra: lättis
     läteq+N+Pl+Ter: lättiniq
     läteq+N+Pl+Abe: lättildäq
     läteq+N+Pl+Com: lättidegaq
